Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1020
Permanent assignment of bureau fleet vehicle; approval
required.

Any agency which has a permanently assigned bureau fleet vehicle shall,
prior to assigning such vehicle to an employee on a twenty-four-hour basis,
obtain written approval from the chief of the transportation services bureau.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 10.